Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-375
Subdivisions; dedication of avenues, streets, alleys; hard surfacing.

The county board shall have power to compel the owner of any real property in such area in subdividing, platting, or laying out the same to conform to the requirements of the resolution and to lay out and dedicate the avenues, streets, and alleys and hard surfacing thereof in accordance therewith.

Laws 1961, c. 94, § 4, p. 322.